src/morphology/lexicon.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Bashkir language
! Copyright © 2012 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
! !!            !!!Bashkir morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !
!! INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Bashkir LANGUAGE.
 

Multichar_Symbols  !!≈ !!!@CODE@ definitions

!! !!Analysis symbols
!! ----------------
!! The morphological analyses of wordforms of Bashkir language are presented
!! in this system in terms of following symbols.
!! (It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

!! The parts-of-speech are:
 +N +A +Adv +V                                 !!≈
 +Pron +CS +CC +Adp +Po +Pr +Interj +Pcle +Num !!≈

!! The parts of speech are further split up into:
 +Prop +Pers +Dem +Interr +Refl +Recipr +Rel +Indef

!! The Usage extents are marked using following tags:
 +Err/Sub   
 +Use/-Spell 

!! The nominals are inflected in the following Case and Number
 +Sg +Du +Pl
 +Ess +Nom +Gen +Acc +Ill +Loc +Com +Com/Sh

!! The possession is marked as such:
 +PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxDu1 +PxDu2 +PxDu3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
!! The comparative forms are:
 +Comp +Superl
!! Numerals are classified under:
 +Attr +Card
 +Ord 
!! Verb moods are:
 +Ind +Prs +Prt +Pot +Cond +Imprt
!! Verb personal forms are:
 +Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Du1 +Du2 +Du3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
!! Other verb forms are
 +Inf +Ger +ConNeg +ConNegII +Neg +ImprtII +PrsPrc +PrfPrc +Sup +VGen +VAbess

! Abbreviated words are classified with:
 +ABBR +ACR 
!! Special symbols are classified with:
+CLB +PUNCT +LEFT +RIGHT
!! The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:
 +TV +IV
!! Special multiword units are analysed with:
 +Multi
!! Non-dictionary words can be recognised with:
 +Guess

!! Question and Focus particles:
 +Qst +Foc


!! Semantics are classified with
 +Mal +Fem +Sur 
 +Plc 
 +Org
 +Obj
 +Ani
 +Hum
 +Plant
 +Group
 +Time 
 +Txt
 +Route
 +Measr 
 +Wthr
 +Build 
 +Edu
 +Veh
 +Clth


!! Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
!! source and target part-of-speech.
 +V→N +V→V +V→A
 +Der/xxx


!! Morphophonology
!! ---------------
!! To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
!! symbols in the lexicon files:
 {aä} {oö} {uü}

!! And following triggers to control variation
 {front} {back}

!! !!Flag diacritics
!! We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
!! flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
!! with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@    !!≈ | @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
 @D.NeedNoun.ON@    !!≈ | @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
 @C.NeedNoun@       !!≈ | @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
!! 
!! For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
!! to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
!! handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
!! do no harm.
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
 @D.CmpPref.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
 @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
 @D.CmpLast.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Block such words from entering R
 @D.CmpNone.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
 @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
 @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
 @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.
!! 
!! Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
!! nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
!! these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
!! given the proper use of these flags.
 @U.Cap.Obl@        !!≈ | @CODE@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
 @U.Cap.Opt@        !!≈ | @CODE@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

LEXICON Root
!! The word forms in Bashkir language start from the lexeme roots of basic
!! word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
0   Adjectives.lexc       ;
0   Adverbs.lexc       ;
0   Conjunctors.lexc       ;
0   Dependents.lexc       ;
0   Ideophs.lexc       ;
0   Interjections.lexc       ;
0   Nouns.lexc       ;
0   Numerals.lexc       ;
0   Particles.lexc       ;
0   Postpositions.lexc       ;
0   Prefixes.lexc       ;
0   Pronouns.lexc       ;
0   Verbs.lexc       ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Adjectives
!! ---------------
!! Adjectives in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON A_
+A: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Adverbs
!! ---------------
!! Adverbs in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON ADV_
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON ADV_А 
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>раҡ # ;

LEXICON ADV_ӘД
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>ерәк # ;

LEXICON ADV_АҘ
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>ыраҡ # ;

LEXICON ADV_ӨҘ
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>өрәк # ;

LEXICON ADV_Е
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>рәк # ;

LEXICON ADV_ОҠ
+Adv: # ;
+Adv+Cmp:%>ораҡ # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Conjunctors
!! ---------------
!! Conjunctors in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON CC_
+CC: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Dependents
!! ---------------
!! Dependents in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON X_

+X: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Ideophs
!! ---------------
!! Ideophs in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON Ideoph_

+Ideoph: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Interjections
!! ---------------
!! Interjections in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON Interj_
+Interj: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Nouns
!! ---------------
!! Nouns in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON N_

+N: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Numerals
!! ---------------
!! Numerals in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON Num_

+Num: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Particles
!! ---------------
!! Particles in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON Pcle_

+Pcle: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Postpositions
!! ---------------
!! Postpositions in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON Po_

+Po: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Pronouns
!! ---------------
!! Pronouns in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON Pron_

+Pron: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Propernouns
!! ---------------
!! Propernouns in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON PROP_
+WORK: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Verbs
!! ---------------
!! Verbs in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON V_

+V: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Adjectives
!! ----------
!! Adjectives in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON Conjunctors

шуға CC_ ;
да CC_ ;
ҙа CC_ ;
ла CC_ ;
та CC_ ;
хатта CC_ ;
юҡһа CC_ ;
яхуд CC_ ;
әле CC_ ;
ки CC_ ;
таки CC_ ;
бәлки CC_ ;
сөнки CC_ ;
кашки CC_ ;
йәки CC_ ;
гүйәки CC_ ;
ни CC_ ;
йәғни CC_ ;
тик CC_ ;
һәм CC_ ;
шунлыҡтан CC_ ;
ләкин CC_ ;
йәғни-мәҫәлән:йәғни-#мәҫәлән CC_ ;
менән CC_ ;
әгәр CC_ ;
мәгәр CC_ ;
иллә-мәгәр:иллә-#мәгәр CC_ ;
фәҡәт CC_ ;
тағы CC_ ;
ә CC_ ;
вә CC_ ;
дә CC_ ;
ҙә CC_ ;
йә CC_ ;
гүйә CC_ ;
әтнәкә CC_ ;
лә CC_ ;
иллә CC_ ;
әллә CC_ ;
әммә CC_ ;
берсә CC_ ;
гәрсә CC_ ;
тә CC_ ;
юғиһә CC_ ;
йәиһә CC_ ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Dependents
!! -----
!! Dependents in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON Adjectives
бәйһеҙ A_ ;
йоғошһоҙ A_ ;
мәҙһәбәһендәге A_ ;
иңле A_ ;
ғәҙәти A_ ;
производство-техник:производство-#техник A_ ;
шыйғалаҡ A_ ;
һары-ҡыҙыл:һары-#ҡыҙыл A_ ;
һолло A_ ;
ҡыҙҙырғыс A_ ;
ҡарамағындағы A_ ;
фронттағы A_ ;
мышаяҡлы A_ ;
ярһыулы A_ ;
LEXICON Adverbs
уңға-һулға:уңға-#һулға ADV_А ;
унда-һанда:унда-#һанда ADV_А ;
ыңғайҙа ADV_А ;
алъюҫыҡҡа ADV_А ;
элә-сала:элә-#сала ADV_А ;
әйләнә-тулғана:әйләнә-#тулғана ADV_А ;
уғаса ADV_А ;
ҡутарғанса ADV_А ;
ҡыҙҙарса ADV_А ;
алйоттарса ADV_А ;
шартлыса ADV_А ;
йөҙмә-йөҙ:йөҙмә-#йөҙ ADV_ӨҘ ;
апалы-энеле:апалы-#энеле ADV_Е ;
ғүмере ADV_Е ;
һәргиз ADV_ӘД ;
биғәйни ADV_А ;
балтырғандай ADV_АҘ ;
ауыҙҙай ADV_АҘ ;
таҡай-тоҡай:таҡай-#тоҡай ADV_АҘ ;
улай ADV_АҘ ;
арымай-талмай:арымай-#талмай ADV_АҘ ;
ысыҡтай ADV_АҘ ;
юрый ADV_АҘ ;
йәшендәй ADV_ӘД ;
икенселәй ADV_ӘД ;
өндәшмәй-нитмәй:өндәшмәй-#нитмәй ADV_ӘД ;
күберәк:күберәк ADV_ӘД ;
тоҡтомал ADV_АҘ ;
тором-тором:тором-#тором ADV_ОҠ ;
ысындан ADV_АҘ ;
баянан ADV_АҘ ;
иртәгеһен ADV_ӘД ;
борон ADV_ОҠ ;
борон-борон:борон-#борон ADV_ОҠ ;
кисҡорон ADV_ОҠ ;
элеккегөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
өлөкөгөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
көҙөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
көндән-көн:көндән-#көн ADV_ӨҘ ;
төнөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
әпен-төпөн:әпен-#төпөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
бөйөртөн ADV_ӨҘ ;
әмән ADV_ӘД ;
өҫтән ADV_ӘД ;
көнө ADV_Е ;
немецсалап:немецсалап ADV_АҘ ;
баҫҡыслап:баҫҡыслап ADV_АҘ ;
талпынып-елпенеп:талпынып-#елпенеп ADV_ӘД ;
һөйләшеп-гөрләшеп:һөйләшеп-#гөрләшеп ADV_ӘД ;
ашығып-бошоғоп:ашығып-#бошоғоп ADV_ОҠ ;
өҙөп-йолҡоп:өҙөп-#йолҡоп ADV_ОҠ ;
тартып-йолҡоп:тартып-#йолҡоп ADV_ОҠ ;
ҡаҙып-соҡоп:ҡаҙып-#соҡоп ADV_ОҠ ;
юғалып-онотолоп:юғалып-#онотолоп ADV_ОҠ ;
йәшенеп-боҫоноп:йәшенеп-#боҫоноп ADV_ОҠ ;
бәреп-ороп:бәреп-#ороп ADV_ОҠ ;
ҡурҡып-өркөп:ҡурҡып-#өркөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
йырлап-көлөп:йырлап-#көлөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
шаярып-көлөп:шаярып-#көлөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
семетеп-өтөп:семетеп-#өтөп ADV_ӨҘ ;
ҡысҡырып-тауышланып:ҡысҡырып-#тауышланып ADV_АҘ ;
һирәкләп:һирәкләп ADV_ӘД ;
йолҡҡолап-өҙгөсләп:йолҡҡолап-#өҙгөсләп ADV_ӘД ;
шәп-шәп:шәп-#шәп ADV_ӘД ;
шатор-шотор:шатор-#шотор ADV_ОҠ ;
өҙөлдөр ADV_ӨҘ ;
сырт ADV_АҘ ;
тотош ADV_ОҠ ;
өҙөлөш ADV_ӨҘ ;
йәнәш ADV_ӘД ;
әсәле-уллы:әсәле-#уллы ADV_А ;
көс-хәлгә:көс-#хәлгә ADV_Е ;
тикмәгә ADV_Е ;
үткәндә ADV_Е ;
тиктәҫкә ADV_Е ;
йәнәшәлә ADV_Е ;
бәйнә-бәйнә:бәйнә-#бәйнә ADV_Е ;
кәррә ADV_Е ;
ҡәҙимсә ADV_Е ;
вәхшиҙәрсә ADV_Е ;
үтә ADV_Е ;
һуя ADV_А ;
LEXICON Dependents
тыума X_ ;
күреме X_ ;
тырай X_ ;
үпәкәй X_ ;
исраҡ X_ ;
инфраҡыҙыл X_ ;
яйман X_ ;
көйөшлө X_ ;
йөрәк-тамыр:йөрәк-#тамыр X_ ;
тет X_ ;
әләф-тәләф:әләф-#тәләф X_ ;
алды-артты:алды-#артты X_ ;
ишмә X_ ;
LEXICON Ideophs
шай-шой Ideoph_ ;
бажҡ-бажҡ Ideoph_ ;
һыңҡ-һыңҡ Ideoph_ ;
сем Ideoph_ ;
елп Ideoph_ ;
шып-шып Ideoph_ ;
таҡыр-тоҡор Ideoph_ ;
сөр-сөр Ideoph_ ;
бығыр-бығыр Ideoph_ ;
көштөр-ҡаштыр Ideoph_ ;
ыҫҫ Ideoph_ ;
серт-серт Ideoph_ ;
пыш-пыш Ideoph_ ;
LEXICON Interjections
ура Interj_ ;
хе-хе Interj_ ;
валлаһи Interj_ ;
ха-ха-хай Interj_ ;
ай-буй Interj_ ;
һәй Interj_ ;
эһем Interj_ ;
алло Interj_ ;
маладис Interj_ ;
у Interj_ ;
әбеү Interj_ ;
ах-ах Interj_ ;
э-э-э Interj_ ;
LEXICON Nouns
травма N_ ;
демпинг N_ ;
анабиоз N_ ;
иҙгенлек N_ ;
мутант-бәшмәк:мутант-#бәшмәк N_ ;
ҡаҙанлыҡ N_ ;
көл N_ ;
ялман N_ ;
рождество N_ ;
осор N_ ;
фарт N_ ;
такелажсы N_ ;
продукция N_ ;
LEXICON Numerals
йөҙгә-йөҙ:йөҙгә-#йөҙ Num_ ;
бер-ике:бер-#ике Num_ ;
һигеҙенсе Num_ ;
етенсе Num_ ;
утыҙ-ҡырҡ:утыҙ-#ҡырҡ Num_ ;
миллион Num_ ;
ун-ун:ун-#ун Num_ ;
һикһән Num_ ;
өсләп Num_ ;
йөҙәр Num_ ;
етмешәр Num_ ;
дүртәү Num_ ;
алтынсы Num_ ;
LEXICON Particle
хатта Pcle_ ;
ләбаһа Pcle_ ;
әле Pcle_ ;
ярай Pcle_ ;
ул Pcle_ ;
фәлән Pcle_ ;
тап Pcle_ ;
топ Pcle_ ;
тып Pcle_ ;
ярар Pcle_ ;
вәт Pcle_ ;
ә Pcle_ ;
кенә Pcle_ ;
LEXICON Postpositions
урында Po_ ;
уртаһында Po_ ;
алдына Po_ ;
ҡарамайынса Po_ ;
тиңке Po_ ;
бирле Po_ ;
ҡәҙәре Po_ ;
кеүек Po_ ;
ашаһынан Po_ ;
йөҙөнән Po_ ;
алды Po_ ;
нәтижәһендә Po_ ;
үтә Po_ ;
LEXICON Pronouns
барса Pron_ ;
үҙен-үҙе:үҙен-#үҙе Pron_ ;
һинеке Pron_ ;
бөтәһе Pron_ ;
бынаулай Pron_ ;
ҡайсаҡ Pron_ ;
кем Pron_ ;
ниндәйен Pron_ ;
үҙ-үҙенән:үҙ-#үҙенән Pron_ ;
улар Pron_ ;
ниңәлер Pron_ ;
бынау Pron_ ;
барыһы Pron_ ;
LEXICON Verbs
сыжла V_ ;
бутарла V_ ;
репрессияла V_ ;
аушай V_ ;
кәмһетел V_ ;
баҙан V_ ;
ботарлан V_ ;
осоноп-талпын:осоноп-#талпын V_ ;
ирештер V_ ;
аяҡлат V_ ;
сәртләт V_ ;
саңҡы V_ ;
эҫтә V_ ;
